Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 9

Intestate Succession

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

28-9-201. Title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Arkansas Inheritance Code of 1969”.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 25; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-155.

28-9-202. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Descendants” means a person's children, grandchildren, and all others, however remotely related to such a person, who are in a direct line of descent from him or her. In other words, the term “descendants” refers to lineal descendants and excludes an intestate's ascendants or collateral relatives.

The term “descendants”, wherever used in this subchapter, shall also include adopted children and their descendants of the intestate or of any other person in connection with whom the term “descendants” may be used.

In determining which of an intestate's descendants shall constitute an inheriting class, the descendants of a living descendant shall be excluded from the class; and

“Dying intestate” means dying without a valid last will and testament. A person so dying is referred to in this subchapter as an “intestate”, and it is recognized that a person may die wholly or partially intestate.

Where the four children of the intestate who were alive at his death and the five children of the decedent's son who predeceased him had executed disclaimers of interest in the estate with the purpose of having certain property pass to his widow as the surviving spouse, but the other 12 grandchildren and 10 great grandchildren did not execute disclaimers, the property in question did not pass to the widow because under §28-9-214 the estate would pass to the widow only if there were no surviving descendants. The disclaimers in this case resulted in the property in issue passing to the 12 grandchildren and 10 great grandchildren who did not execute disclaimers and not to the widow as the surviving spouse. Hunt v. United States, 566 F. Supp. 356 (E.D. Ark. 1983).

Cited: Lucas v. Handcock, 266 Ark. 142, 583 S.W.2d 491 (1979); Smith v. Wright, 300 Ark. 416, 779 S.W.2d 177 (1989).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 61-132, 61-133.

28-9-203. Intestate succession generally.

Any part of the estate of a decedent not effectively disposed of by his or her will shall pass to his or her heirs as prescribed in the following sections.

In this connection, the terms “heir” and “heirs”, as used in this subchapter, are intended to designate the person or persons who succeed by inheritance to the ownership of real or personal property in respect to which a person dies intestate.

Real estate passes immediately to the heirs upon the death of the intestate, subject to the right of the personal representative under the Probate Code to mortgage, lease, exchange, sell, or possess it for the payment of claims or legacies, the preservation or protection of the assets of the estate, the distribution of the estate, or any other purpose in the best interest of the estate.

However, personalty will pass to the personal representative, if any, for distribution to the heirs unless otherwise disposed of as permitted by the Probate Code.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

Ark. L. Rev.

Andrew L. Lawson, “Body” Building: Expanding Arkansas's Standard for Holographic Wills, 71 Ark. L. Rev. 917 (2019).

Where the heirs of the intestate, who were the four children of the intestate who were alive at his death and the five children of a son who predeceased him, had executed disclaimers of interest in the estate with the purpose of having certain property pass to his widow as the surviving spouse, but the other 12 grandchildren and 10 great grandchildren did not execute disclaimers, the property in question did not pass to the widow because under §28-9-214 the estate would pass to the widow only if there were no surviving descendants. The disclaimers in this case resulted in the property in issue passing to the 12 grandchildren and 10 great grandchildren who did not execute disclaimers and not to the widow as the surviving spouse. Hunt v. United States, 566 F. Supp. 356 (E.D. Ark. 1983).

If an owner of real property dies leaving a will which devises the property to his widow, but does not make mention of his children, the children are considered pretermitted heirs, and decedent is deemed to have died intestate as to them, so that the title to the property vests immediately in his heirs subject to appropriate provisions for administration under the Probate Code and subject to the widow's dower and homestead rights, if any. Farmers Coop. Ass'n v. Webb, 249 Ark. 277, 459 S.W.2d 815 (1970) (decision under prior law).

Evidence that the child had lived in the home of the putative father for several months and that the putative father had listed the child as a dependent child on his income tax returns for three years, without other acknowledgment of paternity, without testimony of the child's mother, and without marriage of the mother and the putative father was insufficient to establish the child as an heir of the putative father. Bell v. Bell, 249 Ark. 959, 462 S.W.2d 837 (1971).

A widow is not an heir within the meaning of the statute of descent and distribution. Johnson v. Supreme Lodge, 53 Ark. 255, 13 S.W. 794 (1890) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Lucas v. Handcock, 266 Ark. 142, 583 S.W.2d 491 (1979); Farris v. Farris, 287 Ark. 479, 700 S.W.2d 371 (1985); Sutton v. Milburn, 289 Ark. 421, 711 S.W.2d 808 (1986); Hartford Ins. Co. v. Brewer, 54 Ark. App. 1, 922 S.W.2d 360 (1996).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 1; 1973, No. 33, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-131.

28-9-204. Per capita distribution.

Heirs will take per capita in the following circumstances:

If all members of the class who inherit real or personal property from an intestate are related to the intestate in equal degree, they will inherit the intestate's estate in equal shares and will be said to take per capita.

For illustration:

If the intestate leaves no heirs except children, the children will take per capita and in equal shares;

If the intestate leaves no heirs except grandchildren, all the grandchildren will take per capita and in equal shares; and

If the inheriting class consists solely of great-grandchildren, or any more remote descendants of the intestate who are all related to the intestate in the same degree, they will take per capita.

The same rule applies to the inheritance by collateral heirs of the intestate as when, for illustration, the inheriting class consists entirely of brothers and sisters, or consists solely of nieces and nephews who are descendants of deceased brothers and sisters, or consists of any other collateral relatives of the intestate who are related to the intestate in equal degree.

Likewise, when the inheriting class consists of uncles, aunts, and grandparents or great-uncles, great-aunts, and great-grandparents who, under § 28-9-214, may constitute an inheriting class even though they represent different generations, all members of such a class who survive the intestate will take per capita and share equally; and

If the members of the inheriting class are related to the intestate in unequal degree, those in the nearer degree will take per capita or in their own right, and those in the more remote degree will take per stirpes or through representation as provided in § 28-9-205.

Cited: Lucas v. Handcock, 266 Ark. 142, 583 S.W.2d 491 (1979); Dickerson v. Union Nat'l Bank, 268 Ark. 292, 595 S.W.2d 677 (1980).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-134.

28-9-205. Per stirpes distribution.

Heirs will take “per stirpes” if the intestate is predeceased by one (1) or more persons who would have been entitled to inherit from the intestate had such a person survived the intestate.

The intestate's estate shall be divided into as many equal shares as there are:

Surviving heirs in the nearest degree of kinship to the intestate; and

Persons, hereinafter called “predeceased persons”, in the same degree of kinship as the heirs mentioned in subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section, who predeceased the intestate leaving descendants who survived the intestate.

Each surviving heir in the nearest degree taking per capita shall receive one (1) share and the descendants of each predeceased person taking per stirpes shall collectively receive one (1) share.

If the descendants of a predeceased person are all related to the predeceased person in the same degree, they will take in equal parts the share accruing to them collectively.

However, if such descendants are related to the predeceased person in unequal degree, the share accruing to them collectively shall pass per capita to those in the nearer degree and per stirpes to those in the more remote degree according to the formula set out in subdivision (a)(3) of this section.

If the descendants of a predeceased person are found in multiple generations, the above formula for division shall be applied in respect to the descendants in each generation.

The provisions of this section shall be applied to both real and personal property and to both lineal and collateral heirs.

However, if under § 28-9-214, the inheriting class consists of grandparents and uncles and aunts, or of great-grandparents and great-uncles and great-aunts, the per stirpes rule shall apply when an uncle or aunt, or great-uncle or great-aunt, as the case may be, shall predecease the intestate, leaving descendants. However, it shall not be applied in respect to a grandparent or great-grandparent of the intestate who predeceased the intestate. In this event the grandparent or great-grandparent shall not be counted in determining the number of shares passing to the members of the inheriting class or those taking through them by representation.

Where a benefit certificate of a life insurance company is payable at a mother's death to her children, the issue of a child who died before the mother succeeds to the parent's share. Johnson v. Hall, 55 Ark. 210, 17 S.W. 874 (1891) (decision under prior law).

After setting aside the widow's share, there being no nearer kindred than nephews and nieces, an intestate's ancestral estate shall be divided into as many shares as there are living nephews and nieces or, being deceased, then having descendants alive. The nephews and nieces take per capita while descendants of those deceased take per stirpes. Daniels v. Johnson, 216 Ark. 374, 226 S.W.2d 571, 15 A.L.R.2d 1401 (1950) (decision under prior law).

In a probate dispute regarding the estate of the decedent, because the decedent's aunts, uncles, and grandparents had predeceased her, the per capita distribution of the estate at the first-cousin level under subdivision (a)(2) of this section was proper as it was the first level at which the intestate had surviving heirs, regardless of what level was used to determine the inheriting class under §28-9-214.Stokan v. Estate of Cann, 100 Ark. App. 216, 266 S.W.3d 210 (2007).

Cited: Dickerson v. Union Nat'l Bank, 268 Ark. 292, 595 S.W.2d 677 (1980).

All statutory rights and allowances to the surviving spouse and minor children;

Any rights of a surviving spouse in respect to income tax refunds made pursuant to a joint federal income tax return; and

An administration of the estate, if any.

In this connection it is declared that subject to the conditions set out above, the intestate's entire right and title in respect to any and all reversionary and remainder interests, rights of reentry or forfeiture for condition broken, executory interests, and possibilities of reverter, whether any of such interests are vested or contingent, shall be transmissible by inheritance and will pass to the intestate's heirs determined as of the time of the intestate's death.

An intestate may transmit his or her title to real or personal property by inheritance even though:

The intestate is not in actual or constructive possession thereof; and

There may be adverse possession thereof.

Where a husband died seized of estate in land for life of another, his widow was entitled to receive as dower one-third thereof, absolutely, as in case of personalty. Stull v. Graham, 60 Ark. 461, 31 S.W. 46 (1895) (decision under prior law).

Under a devise of a life estate to the only child of the devisor, with no designation of a remainderman, the child takes the fee under the statute of descent. Wyatt v. Henry, 121 Ark. 479, 181 S.W. 297 (1915) (decision under prior law).

A personal right to use land is not inheritable. Field v. Morris, 88 Ark. 148, 114 S.W. 206 (1908) (decision under prior law).

The interest of a purchaser under a bond for title is inheritable. Hill v. Heard, 104 Ark. 23, 148 S.W. 254 (1912) (decision under prior law).

A conveyance of land by a grantor to a named son “and unto his bodily, or his brothers and sisters heirs and assigns forever” amounted in substance to a conveyance to the son for life, with a remainder to (a) the son's bodily heirs, or, if the son should leave no bodily heirs, then to (b) the heirs of his brothers and sisters; such conveyance was not brought within the rule in Shelley's case by means of clause (b). Robertson v. Sloan, 222 Ark. 671, 262 S.W.2d 148 (1953) (decision under prior law).

Title to all lands of a father and mother who were murdered by their son vested in their only other heir, another son, and the issue of the son who had been convicted of the murders was not entitled to any interest in the lands of his deceased grandparents. Wright v. Wright, 248 Ark. 105, 449 S.W.2d 952 (1970) (decision under prior law).

Personalty converted into realty by surviving partner descends as realty. Coolidge v. Burke, 69 Ark. 237, 62 S.W. 583 (1901) (decision under prior law).

The owner of personal property may dispose of it at will during his life. Wooton v. Keaton, 168 Ark. 981, 272 S.W. 869 (1925) (decision under prior law).

Immediately upon an intestate's death, the title to real estate descends to the heirs at law. Dean v. Brown, 216 Ark. 761, 227 S.W.2d 623 (1950) (decision under prior law).

Where a widow, pursuant to a family agreement, conveys her homestead and dower interests in certain lands of her husband to one of his heirs, she will be held to have abandoned her rights therein. Felton v. Brown, 102 Ark. 658, 145 S.W. 552 (1912) (decision under prior law).

Where an only child dies before the husband, the surviving wife does not, as the child's heir, inherit the whole of the husband's land on his death, as there is no title to pass through the child. Smith v. Goldby, 172 Ark. 549, 289 S.W. 780 (1927) (decision under prior law).

Where property had been devised to the widow of the decedent under a will which made no mention of his children, the children became pretermitted heirs in the land of the deceased parent, and a judgment creditor of one of the surviving children and heir-at-law could levy execution on the interest of such heir in the land in question. Farmers Coop. Ass'n v. Webb, 249 Ark. 277, 459 S.W.2d 815 (1970) (decision under prior law).

Lands held by tenants in common by descent are distributed in equal shares. Cottonwood Lumber Co. v. Walker, 106 Ark. 102, 152 S.W. 1005 (1912) (decision under prior law).

As a general rule, the legal, as distinguished from equitable, title determines the course of descent. Howard v. Grant, 107 Ark. 594, 156 S.W. 433 (1913) (decision under prior law).

All war risk instalments of insurance become assets of the estate of the insured to be distributed to his heirs in accordance with the intestacy laws as of the date of his death, and upon the subsequent death of one of the beneficiaries, his share goes to his heirs. Jones v. Jones, 186 Ark. 359, 53 S.W.2d 586 (1932) (decision under prior law).

Where beneficiary under war risk policy was intestate veteran's only heir as of date of his death, balance due on beneficiary's death was payable as provided in his will and not to veteran's heirs as of date of beneficiary's death. Wade v. Wade, 192 Ark. 7, 90 S.W.2d 214 (1936), cert. denied, 299 U.S. 548, 57 S. Ct. 11, 81 L. Ed. 404 (1936) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Fletcher v. Hurdle, 259 Ark. 640, 536 S.W.2d 109 (1976).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-135.

28-9-206. Interests transmissible by inheritance.

Heirs may inherit every right, title, and interest not terminated by the intestate's death in real or personal property owned by an intestate at the time of the intestate's death and not disposed of by will.

The rights of heirs will be subject to:

The dower or curtesy of the intestate's surviving spouse;

The homestead rights of the surviving spouse and children of the intestate, including the quarantine rights of the surviving spouse;

The portion of the intestate's estate which may pass by inheritance, after giving effect to subsection (b) of this section and to any partial testamentary disposition, is hereinafter sometimes called the “heritable estate” of the intestate.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, §§ 7, 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 61-137, 61-138.

28-9-207. Heirs as tenants in common.

When real or personal property is transmitted by inheritance to two (2) or more persons, they will take the same as tenants in common. However, when personal property is distributed in separate units by a personal representative, each distributee will hold his or her distributed part in severalty.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-139.

28-9-208. Male not preferred over female.

The common law principle that in the matter of inheritance the male will be preferred over the female shall constitute no part of the Arkansas law of inheritance.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-140.

28-9-209. Legitimacy of child — Effect.

If the parents of a child have lived together as man and wife and, before the birth of their child, have participated in a marriage ceremony in apparent compliance with the law of the state where the marriage ceremony was performed, though the attempted marriage is void, their child is deemed to be the legitimate child of both parents for all purposes of intestate succession.

A child born or conceived during a marriage is presumed to be the legitimate child of both spouses for the same purposes.

If a man has a child or children by a woman, and afterward intermarries with her and recognizes the child or children to be his, the child or children shall be deemed and considered legitimate.

Any child conceived following artificial insemination of a married woman with the consent of her husband shall be treated as their child for all purposes of intestate succession. Consent of the husband is presumed unless the contrary is shown by clear and convincing evidence.

An illegitimate child or his or her descendants may inherit real or personal property in the same manner as a legitimate child from the child's mother or her blood kindred. The child may inherit real or personal property from his or her father or from his or her father's blood kindred, provided that at least one (1) of the following conditions is satisfied and an action is commenced or claim asserted against the estate of the father in a court of competent jurisdiction within one hundred eighty (180) days of the death of the father:

A court of competent jurisdiction has established the paternity of the child or has determined the legitimacy of the child pursuant to subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section;

The man has made a written acknowledgment that he is the father of the child;

The man's name appears with his written consent on the birth certificate as the father of the child;

The mother and father intermarry prior to the birth of the child;

The mother and putative father attempted to marry each other prior to the birth of the child by a marriage solemnized in apparent compliance with law, although the attempted marriage is or could be declared invalid; or

The putative father is obligated to support the child under a written voluntary promise or by court order.

Property of an illegitimate person passes in accordance with the usual rules of intestate succession to his or her mother and his or her kindred of her blood and to his or her father and his or her kindred of his or her father's blood, provided that paternity has been established in accordance with subsection (d) of this section.

Nothing contained in this section shall extend the time within which a right of inheritance or a right to a succession may be asserted beyond the time provided by law relating to distribution and closing of decedents' estates or to the determination of heirship, or otherwise.

Ark. L. Rev.

Legitimacy and Paternity, 14 Ark. L. Rev. 55.

Fuqua, Comments: Bastardy Law in Arkansas — The Need for Revision, 33 Ark. L. Rev. 178.

Mark James Chaney, Recent Developments: Arkansas Supreme Court Holds Presumed-Legitimate Children Seeking to Inherit from Out-of-Wedlock Fathers Must Meet the Same Statutory Requirements as Illegitimate Children to Make a Claim Against an Estate, and Paternity Must Be Established Within 180 Days of the Decedent's Death, 67 Ark. L. Rev. 509 (2014).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey of Arkansas Law, Constitutional Law, 1 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 140.

Survey of Arkansas Law, Decedents' Estates, 1 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 185.

Survey of Arkansas Law, Family Law, 1 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 200.

Jans, Survey of Decedents' Estates, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 216.

Arkansas Law Survey, Irving, Family Law, 9 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 173.

Survey — Property, 11 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 243.

This section does not unconstitutionally discriminate against blacks. Brown v. Danley, 263 Ark. 480, 566 S.W.2d 385, cert. denied, 439 U.S. 983, 99 S. Ct. 572, 58 L. Ed. 2d 654 (1978).

Former provision of subsection (d) limiting the right of an illegitimate child to inherit from its father bore no rational relationship to any legitimate state purpose. Lucas v. Handcock, 266 Ark. 142, 583 S.W.2d 491 (1979) (decision under prior law).

This section does not violate the equal protection clause of U.S. Const. Amend. 14. Statutory differentiation based solely on illegitimacy can be justified by a state's interests in preventing spurious claims against intestate estates, and in the maintenance of a prompt and accurate method of distributing an intestate's property. Boatman v. Dawkins, 294 Ark. 421, 743 S.W.2d 800 (1988).

Requirement that an action be filed and a condition satisfied within 180 days did not violate a purported beneficiary's federal constitutional due process rights because she had no right to bring a paternity action on her own behalf since she was a person for whom paternity was presumed. The purported beneficiary was seeking to recover as a pretermitted heir.Bell v. McDonald, 2014 Ark. 75, 432 S.W.3d 18 (2014).

Requirement that an action be filed and a condition satisfied within 180 days did not violate a purported beneficiary's federal constitutional equal protection rights because she had no right to bring a paternity action on her own behalf since she was a person for whom paternity was presumed. The purported beneficiary was seeking to recover as a pretermitted heir.Bell v. McDonald, 2014 Ark. 75, 432 S.W.3d 18 (2014).

Former statute was not applicable where question involved was whether child born after divorce was issue of the marriage. George v. George, 247 Ark. 17, 444 S.W.2d 62 (1969) (decision under prior law).

This section and §28-40-103 are not applicable in a paternity case; paternity action must be commenced in chancery court because it is not a determination of heirship. In re Estate of F.C., 321 Ark. 191, 900 S.W.2d 200 (1995).

This section is irrelevant in the context of the distribution of the proceeds of a wrongful-death settlement. Rager v. Turley, 68 Ark. App. 187, 6 S.W.3d 113 (1999).

Subsection (d) does not apply to claims to share in a wrongful-death settlement. Rager v. Turley, 342 Ark. 223, 27 S.W.3d 729 (2000).

Where the alleged heir had never been determined a legitimate heir of the decedent, his petition for appointment as administrator of the estate could not constitute an action or claim against the estate under subsection (d) of this section because the alleged heir did not comply with the 180-day requirement. Burns v. Estate of Cole, 364 Ark. 280, 219 S.W.3d 134 (2005).

Annulment decree against mother on the ground that she was pregnant by other man, which was offered into evidence to determine heirship of son to intestate's estate, was not res judicata as to question of legitimacy of son. Earp v. Earp, 250 Ark. 107, 464 S.W.2d 70 (1971) (decision under prior law).

Children of bigamous marriage were legitimate and entitled to inherit from their father. Evatt v. Miller, 114 Ark. 84, 169 S.W. 817 (1914); Cooper v. McCoy, 116 Ark. 501, 173 S.W. 412 (1915); Morrison v. Nicks, 211 Ark. 261, 200 S.W.2d 100 (1947) (decision under prior law).

Marriage between plaintiff and defendant while defendant was legally married to another was void, but divorce proceeding would be remanded for the purpose of entering order legitimatizing children born of union. Bruno v. Bruno, 221 Ark. 759, 256 S.W.2d 341 (1953) (decision under prior law).

The fact that a mother may not have been divorced from former husband would not be material insofar as the legitimacy of a child is concerned. Yocum v. Holmes, 222 Ark. 251, 258 S.W.2d 535 (1953) (decision under prior law).

Where a serviceman's life insurance policy named no beneficiary but stated that proceeds were to go first to a widow, second to a child, and third to his parents, the proceeds would go to his illegitimate child whose paternity he had acknowledged by affidavit filed in court. Cantrell v. Prudential Ins. Co. of Am., 252 Ark. 70, 477 S.W.2d 484 (1972).

This section giving an illegitimate child 180 days to file a claim creates a new right, and the right is created for only 180 days. State interests may justify the imposition of special requirements upon an illegitimate child who asserts a right to inherit from her father, and, of course, it justifies the enforcement of generally applicable limitations on the time and the manner in which claims may be asserted. Boatman v. Dawkins, 294 Ark. 421, 743 S.W.2d 800 (1988).

Because there is no comma separating “illegitimate child” and the modifier “except such as would inherit under the law of descent and distribution” in the definition of child in §28-1-102(a)(1), the General Assembly intended for “except such as would inherit…” to modify only “illegitimate children.” McCoy v. Walker, 317 Ark. 86, 876 S.W.2d 252 (1994).

The heirs of the decedent were not estopped from invoking the requirement of subsection (d) of this section that the illegitimate son of the decedent commence an action against the decedent's estate within 180 days of the decedent's death, notwithstanding that the illegitimate son had been acknowledged by the decedent, that he was named as the decedent's son in his obituary, and that he was described as an heir in a deed. Rasberry v. Ivory, 67 Ark. App. 227, 998 S.W.2d 431 (1999).

Illegitimate child was awarded a share of his father's estate as a pretermitted heir under §28-39-407(b) where the wife waived an issue regarding competent jurisdiction by failing to object to a failure to join the estate in a paternity action; moreover, collateral estoppel applied because the wife appeared at the paternity proceeding, it was fully litigated, the necessary party issue was not raised, and no appeal was filed. Taylor v. Hamilton, 90 Ark. App. 235, 205 S.W.3d 149 (2005).

Time limitations in the nonclaim statute, §28-50-101(a), do not apply to claims by illegitimate children under subsection (d) of this section; therefore, the trial court did not err by finding that an illegitimate son was a pretermitted heir. Taylor v. Hamilton, 90 Ark. App. 235, 205 S.W.3d 149 (2005).

Circuit court did not err in finding that one of the six conditions set out in subdivisions (d)(1)-(6) was required to be satisfied within 180 days from the death of the decedent; the alleged heir failed to commence an action or assert a claim pursuant to the statute. Burns v. Estate of Cole, 364 Ark. 280, 219 S.W.3d 134 (2005).

Decedent's illegitimate, pretermitted child was not entitled to inherit from decedent as he was required to meet requirements of §§28-39-407(b),28-1-102(a)(1), and the six requirements of subsection (d) of this section, but he failed to show that he had been recognized by the decedent or by a court and he failed to file his action within 180 days of decedent's death.Shelton v. Keathley, 367 Ark. 568, 242 S.W.3d 223 (2006).

Under a plain reading of the language in this section, one of the six conditions must have been satisfied and an action commenced or a claim asserted against the estate prior to the expiration of the 180-day time period. Therefore, where a paternity case was not completed within the time period, a purported beneficiary failed to state a claim to recover from an estate as a pretermitted heir.Bell v. McDonald, 2014 Ark. 75, 432 S.W.3d 18 (2014).

Circuit court did not err in recognizing a son born out of wedlock as the decedent's sole heir because the son satisfied the written-acknowledgment condition in subsection (d) of this section; a beneficiary-designation form depicted that the decedent clearly wrote “son” and provided the son's proper name, Social Security number, date of birth, address, phone number, and gender on the form, and the 180-day limit was satisfied because the form was completed before decedent's death.Noble v. Neal, 2019 Ark. App. 86, 572 S.W.3d 40 (2019).

Court's establishment of paternity is the particular statutory condition that must be met within 180 days following decedent's death; a decedent's acknowledgment must have been accomplished before the decedent's death, allowing a child born out of wedlock 180 days following a putative father's death to make a claim based on the decedent's written acknowledgment.Noble v. Neal, 2019 Ark. App. 86, 572 S.W.3d 40 (2019).

A parent's testimony is incompetent when it is employed to bastardize a child, which is presumed legitimate by one of the strongest presumptions found in the law. Bankston v. Prime W. Corp., 271 Ark. 727, 610 S.W.2d 586 (1981).

There is a statutory presumption that a child born during a marriage is the legitimate child of both spouses. The longstanding common law rule is that the declarations of a father or mother, cannot be admitted to bastardize the issue born after marriage. Lakey v. Lakey, 18 Ark. App. 182, 712 S.W.2d 663 (1986).

Presumption of legitimacy of a child conceived, but not born, during marriage, is rebuttable. Willmon v. Hunter, 297 Ark. 358, 761 S.W.2d 924 (1988).

A child is considered legitimate if the parents were married at the time of its conception and before its birth, even though they were not married to each other at the time the child was born. Willmon v. Hunter, 297 Ark. 358, 761 S.W.2d 924 (1988).

It is not against the public policy of this state to allow a third party to attempt to illegitimize a child which was conceived, but not born, during marriage. Willmon v. Hunter, 297 Ark. 358, 761 S.W.2d 924 (1988).

Evidence established recognition of child by father. Rogers v. Morgan, 213 Ark. 229, 210 S.W.2d 129 (1948); Parker v. Hadley, 227 Ark. 161, 296 S.W.2d 391 (1956); Tuttle v. Phillips, 249 Ark. 617, 460 S.W.2d 328 (1970) (decision under prior law).

Evidence insufficient to establish paternity. Martin v. Martin, 212 Ark. 204, 205 S.W.2d 189 (1947); Edgar v. Dickens, 230 Ark. 7, 320 S.W.2d 761 (1959); Johnson v. Sanford, 239 Ark. 362, 389 S.W.2d 421 (1965) (decision under prior law); Eldridge v. Sullivan, 980 F.2d 499 (8th Cir. 1992).

In a suit to determine the distribution of proceeds of an insurance policy, it was not error to introduce an affidavit made by the deceased in a bastardy suit after being advised by an attorney, acknowledging that he was the father of the illegitimate child. Cantrell v. Prudential Ins. Co. of Am., 252 Ark. 70, 477 S.W.2d 484 (1972).

Where the proof as a whole indicated that the decedent, upon a number of occasions, had acknowledged the petitioner as being his son, the trial court's finding to the contrary was reversible error. Christman v. Jones, 254 Ark. 936, 497 S.W.2d 14 (1973).

Where in an action partitioning a decedent's estate, some putative heirs of the decedent sought a share of the proceeds when the land was partitioned, the evidence presented did not support their claim through their mother who allegedly was a daughter of the decedent, since the putative heirs did not prove that the decedent even knew their mother's mother some 26 years before he married her or that he fathered her child, the putative heirs' mother, when he was 15 and she was only 13 years of age. Ford v. King, 268 Ark. 128, 594 S.W.2d 227 (1980).

In probate proceeding which occurred after subsection (d) of this section was declared unconstitutional, but prior to 1979 amendment of the subsection, determination that woman was illegitimate daughter of decedent was properly made from clear, cogent, and convincing proof rather than written acknowledgment of the putative father or a judicial determination during the lifetime of the parties. Lewis v. Petty, 272 Ark. 250, 613 S.W.2d 585 (1981).

Testimony as to general reputation in the community on the issue of paternity and woman's birth certificate were admissible in order to determine if the woman was the illegitimate daughter of decedent. Lewis v. Petty, 272 Ark. 250, 613 S.W.2d 585 (1981) (decision under prior law).

Evidence supported the finding that the claimants were the legitimate children of their father and were entitled to inherit from their great-uncle through their father. Allen v. Wallis, 279 Ark. 149, 650 S.W.2d 225 (1983).

Paternity must be proven by clear and convincing evidence, i.e., that which instantly tilts the scales in the affirmative when weighed against evidence in opposition, and clearly convinces the factfinder that the evidence is true. Eldridge v. Sullivan, 980 F.2d 499 (8th Cir. 1992).

There is no language from which a legislative intention that the 1979 amendment to this section should have retroactive effect can be implied. Lucas v. Handcock, 266 Ark. 142, 583 S.W.2d 491 (1979).

To prevent chaotic conditions arising from the lack of title to real property, Trimble v. Gordon, 430 U.S. 762, 97 S. Ct. 1459, 52 L. Ed. 2d 31 (1977), under which former subsection (d) of this section was constitutionally invalid should not be applied retroactively. Frakes v. Hunt, 266 Ark. 171, 583 S.W.2d 497 (1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 942, 100 S. Ct. 297, 62 L. Ed. 2d 309 (1979).

Cited: Walker v. Yarbrough, 257 Ark. 300, 516 S.W.2d 390 (1974); Compton v. White, 266 Ark. 648, 587 S.W.2d 829 (1979); Stewart v. Smith, 269 Ark. 363, 601 S.W.2d 837 (1980); Fulton v. Harris, 658 F.2d 641 (8th Cir. 1981); Henry v. Johnson, 292 Ark. 446, 730 S.W.2d 495 (1987); Finley v. Astrue, 372 Ark. 103, 270 S.W.3d 849 (2008); Finley v. Farm Cat, Inc., 103 Ark. App. 292, 288 S.W.3d 685 (2008).

ALR.

Legal status of posthumously conceived child of decedent. 17 A.L.R.6th 593.

Child who was created as an embryo through in vitro fertilization during his parents'marriage, but implanted into his mother's womb after his father's death, could not inherit from the father under Arkansas intestacy law as a surviving child under this section; in order to inherit, the child had to have been conceived before the father's death.Finley v. Astrue, 372 Ark. 103, 270 S.W.3d 849 (2008).

Parent or child are related in the first degree;

Grandparent or grandchild are related in the second degree; and

Great-grandparent or great-grandchild are related in the third degree.

When the persons composing the nearest class of kin of an intestate die before his death, the next class in order will be advanced, and the persons composing it will inherit equally if equal in degree, and per stirpes if not in equal degree. Garrett v. Bean, 51 Ark. 52, 9 S.W. 435 (1888); McFarlane v. Grober, 70 Ark. 371, 69 S.W. 56 (1902) (decision under prior law).

Degrees of relationship are counted by the number of degrees removed from the common ancestor. Carton v. Missouri Pac. R.R., 315 Ark. 5, 865 S.W.2d 635 (1993).

First cousins are related in the second degree of consanguinity. Morton v. Benton Publishing Co., 291 Ark. 620, 727 S.W.2d 824 (1987).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 11; 1979, No. 1015, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 61-141, 61-141.1.

28-9-210. Posthumous heirs.

Posthumous descendants of the intestate conceived before his or her death but born thereafter shall inherit in the same manner as if born in the lifetime of the intestate.

However, no right of inheritance shall accrue to any person other than a lineal descendant of the intestate, unless such a person has been born at the time of the intestate's death.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-142.

28-9-211. Alienage.

No person is disqualified to inherit, or transmit by inheritance, real or personal property because he or she is or has been an alien.

An alien may inherit, or transmit by inheritance, as freely as a citizen of this state, subject to the same laws of intestate succession which are applicable to citizens of this state.

The term “alien” as used in this section refers to a person who is not a citizen of the United States.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-143.

28-9-212. Computing degrees of consanguinity.

(1)In computing the degrees of relationship between any two (2) kinsmen who are not related in a direct line of ascent or descent, it is proper to start with the common ancestor of the kinsmen and count downwards. In whatever degree the kinsmen or the more remote of them is distant from the common ancestor, that is the degree in which they are related to each other.

Thus two (2) or more children of a common parent are related to each other in the first degree, because from the common parent to each of the children is counted only one (1) degree.

But a person and his or her nephew are related in the second degree, for the nephew is two (2) degrees removed from his grandparent who is the common ancestor.

A person and his or her second cousin are related in the third degree, for they are both three (3) degrees removed from the great-grandparent who is their common ancestor.

In computing the degrees of relationship between any two (2) kinsmen related in a direct line of ascent or descent, the degree of relationship shall be determined by starting with one (1) of the persons and counting up or down to the other. Thus, a person and his or her:

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-144; Acts 1987, No. 847, § 1.

28-9-213. Kinsmen of the half blood.

An intestate's kinsmen of the half blood will inherit the intestate's real or personal property to the same extent as if they were the intestate's kinsmen of the whole blood.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-145.